Utah statutes.
26-49-401.   Regulatory authority.

(1)  The Department of Health shall make rules by following the procedures and requirements of Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.

(2)  Before adopting rules under Subsection (1), the Department of Health shall consult and consider:

(a)  the recommendations of the entity established to coordinate the implementation of the Emergency Management Assistance Compact; and

(b)  rules adopted by similarly empowered agencies in other states in order to promote uniformity of application of this chapter and make the emergency response systems in the various states reasonably compatible.

